Utah statutes.
11-46-304.   Permit process for community cat colonies.

(1)  A county or municipality may create a permitting process for community cat colonies.

(2)  Any permitting process created by a county or municipality shall provide notice to adjacent property owners by:

(a)  mailing notice to the record owner of each parcel within parameters specified by the permitting process; or

(b)  posting notice on the property with a sign of sufficient size, durability, print quality, and location that is reasonably calculated to give notice to passers-by.



Enacted by Chapter 130, 2011 General Session

